Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5771.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-12.4 of the General Laws entitled "The Rhode Island Medicaid
Reform Act of 2008" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-12.4-10. Fertility care.
(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, the department shall provide coverage under the medical
assistance program for fertility diagnostic care, standard fertility preservation services, and fertility
treatment. Such coverage shall provide for:
(1) Any medically necessary ovulation-enhancing drugs and medical services related to
prescribing and monitoring the use of ovulation-enhancing drugs that is intended to treat infertility
and establish a pregnancy that results in a live birth;
(2) At least three (3) cycles of ovulation-enhancing medication treatment;
(3) Intrauterine insemination; and
(4) In the event that ovulation-enhancing medication treatment administered with intention
to prepare for intrauterine insemination results in an ovulation response that counter-indicates
intrauterine insemination, coverage for in-vitro fertilization and embryo transfer as recommended
by the treating physician.
(b) Coverage under this section shall be provided without discrimination on the basis of
age, ancestry, disability, domestic partner status, gender, gender identity or expression, genetic
information, marital status, national origin, race, religion, sex, or sexual orientation.

(c) On or before January 1, 2026, the department shall, after consultation with the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services, submit a report to the general assembly on whether in-vitro
fertilization is a medically reasonable and necessary procedure under federal law, possible methods
for covering in-vitro fertilization as a medical assistance covered benefit for both fee-for-service
and managed care organizations, including any potentially applicable waiver authorities, and the
amount of money that would need to be allocated to federal and local funds for coverage.
(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Fertility diagnostic care” means procedures, products, genetic testing, medications,
counseling, and services intended to provide information and counseling about an individual’s
infertility, including laboratory assessments and imaging studies.
(2) “Fertility treatment” means procedures, products, genetic testing, medications,
counseling, and services intended to establish a pregnancy that results in a live birth and that are
provided in a manner consistent with established medical practice and professional guidelines
published by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, its successor organization, or a
comparable organization.
(3) “Gamete” means sperm or egg.
(4) “Infertility” means:
(i) The presence of a condition recognized by a health care provider as a cause of loss or
impairment of fertility, based on an individual’s medical, sexual, and reproductive history, age,
physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination of those factors;
(ii) An individual’s inability to establish a pregnancy or to carry a pregnancy to live birth
after twelve (12) months of unprotected sexual intercourse when the individual and the individual’s
partner have the necessary gametes to establish a pregnancy;
(iii) An individual's inability to establish a pregnancy after six (6) months of unprotected
sexual intercourse due to an individual's age when the individual and the individual’s partner have
the necessary gametes to establish pregnancy;
(iv) An individual’s inability to achieve pregnancy as an individual or with a partner
because the individual or the individual and the individual’s partner do not have the necessary
gametes to achieve a pregnancy;
(v) An individual’s increased risk, independently or with the individual’s partner, of
transmitting a serious, inheritable genetic or chromosomal abnormality to a child; or
(vi) As defined by the American Society of Reproductive Medicine, its successor
organization, or comparable organization. Pregnancy resulting in a loss does not cause the time
period of trying to establish a pregnancy to be restarted.
LC000881 - Page 2 of 4

(5) “Intrauterine insemination” means a procedure that places semen directly into a
patient’s uterus at or around the time of ovulation.
(6) "Standard fertility preservation services" means procedures, products, genetic testing,
medications, counseling, and services intended to preserve fertility, consistent with established
medical practice and professional guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive
Medicine, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional medical
organizations, its successor organization, or a comparable organization, for an individual who has
a medical or genetic condition or who is expected to undergo treatment that has a possible side
effect of or may directly or indirectly cause a risk of impairment of fertility and includes, but is not
limited to, the procurement, cryopreservation, and storage of gametes, embryos, and reproductive
material.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000881
========
LC000881 - Page 3 of 4